District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1209.01

Naturopathy.

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 901, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(x), 42 DCR 457
July 8, 2004, D.C. Law 15-172, § 2(h), 51 DCR 4938
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 11, 52 DCR 2638
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 18, 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, §§ 131(a), 188(c), 56 DCR 1117
July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-19, § 2(c), 56 DCR 3629
1981 Ed., § 2-3309.1.